Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2694XS (2) 91 ss/ns S.F. 365 Section 1. MARTIN TREPTOW ââ CAPITOL COMPLEX MONUMENT. 1 1. The department of administrative services, in 2 consultation with the capitol planning commission, shall 3 authorize the placement of a monument to Martin Treptow on the 4 capitol complex grounds subject to the requirements of this 5 section. 6 2. The department of administrative services shall solicit 7 and approve an application for the construction of a monument 8 to Martin Treptow as an Iowa state capitol complex site 9 feature. An application for the construction of the monument 10 must specify the design concept for the monument, provide an 11 estimated total cost for the site feature, identify planned 12 sources of funding, provide a proposed timeline for the 13 project, and such other information as the department requires. 14 Each proposed design concept must include a plate, engraving, 15 or other method by which the poem âMy Pledgeâ by Martin Treptow 16 appears on the monument. If more than one application is 17 submitted, the department, in consultation with the capitol 18 planning commission, shall approve the application that can 19 best meet the requirements for construction and maintenance of 20 the site feature. 21